Missouri, session 2026, SB1087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.309 and 302.341, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 302.309 and 302.341, to read as follows:
302.309. 1. Whenever any license is suspended
pursuant to sections 302.302 to 302.309, the director of
revenue shall return the license to the operator immediately
upon the termination of the period of suspension and upon
compliance with the requirements of chapter 303.
2. Any operator whose license is revoked pursuant to
[these] sections 302.302 to 302.309, upon the termination of
the period of revocation, shall apply for a new license in
the manner prescribed by law.
3. (1) All circuit courts, the director of revenue,
or a commissioner operating under section 478.007 shall have
jurisdiction to hear applications and make eligibility
determinations granting limited driving privileges, except
as provided under subdivision (8) of this subsection. Any
application may be made in writing to the director of
revenue and the person's specific and necessary reasons for
requesting the limited driving privilege shall be made
therein, including the times, routes, and purposes of the
proposed travel necessary for obtaining the limited driving


privilege. The burden shall be on the operator to
demonstrate to the court or the department that the limited
driving privilege is essential for the reasons listed in
subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) When any court of record having jurisdiction or
the director of revenue finds that an operator is required
to operate a motor vehicle in connection with any of the
following:
(a) A business, occupation, or employment;
(b) Seeking medical treatment for such operator;
(c) Attending school or other institution of higher
education;
(d) Attending alcohol- or drug-treatment programs;
(e) Seeking the required services of a certified
ignition interlock device provider; [or]
(f) Attending a place of worship;
(g) Traveling to and from essential businesses
including, but not limited to, grocery stores, supermarkets,
hardware stores, convenience and discount stores,
pharmacies, post offices and other shipping outlets, and gas
stations; or
(h) Any other circumstance the court or director finds
would create an undue hardship on the operator,
the court or director may grant such limited driving
privilege as the circumstances of the case justify if the
court or director finds undue hardship would result to the
individual, and while so operating a motor vehicle within
the restrictions and limitations of the limited driving
privilege the driver shall not be guilty of operating a
motor vehicle without a valid license. The court has the
authority to grant the request for limited driving
privileges under such restrictions as the court deems


necessary, including restrictions as to routes, schedules,
geographic limitations, or other conditions deemed
necessary to ensure the operator's safe and limited
operation of a motor vehicle. The court shall retain
authority to revoke or modify any grant of a limited driving
privilege upon a showing that the continued operation of a
motor vehicle by the operator would endanger other motorists
or violate any term or condition imposed by the court.
(3) An operator may make application to the proper
court in the county in which such operator resides or in the
county in which is located the operator's principal place of
business or employment. Any application for a limited
driving privilege made to a circuit court shall name the
director as a party defendant and shall be served upon the
director prior to the grant of any limited privilege, and
shall be accompanied by a copy of the applicant's driving
record as certified by the director. Any applicant for a
limited driving privilege shall have on file with the
department of revenue proof of financial responsibility as
required by chapter 303. Any application by a person who
transports persons or property as classified in section
302.015 may be accompanied by proof of financial
responsibility as required by chapter 303, but if proof of
financial responsibility does not accompany the application,
or if the applicant does not have on file with the
department of revenue proof of financial responsibility, the
court or the director has discretion to grant the limited
driving privilege to the person solely for the purpose of
operating a vehicle whose owner has complied with chapter
303 for that vehicle, and the limited driving privilege must
state such restriction. When operating such vehicle under
such restriction the person shall carry proof that the owner
has complied with chapter 303 for that vehicle.


(4) No limited driving privilege shall be issued to
any person otherwise eligible under the provisions of
subdivision (6) of this subsection if such person has a
license denial under paragraph (a) or (b) of subdivision (8)
of this subsection or on a license revocation resulting from
a conviction under subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of
section 302.302, or a license revocation under subdivision
(2) of subsection 2 of section 302.525, or section 302.574
or 577.041, until the applicant has filed proof with the
department of revenue that any motor vehicle operated by the
person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device as a required condition of limited driving
privilege. The ignition interlock device required for
obtaining a limited driving privilege under paragraph (a) or
(b) of subdivision (8) of this subsection shall have a photo
100 identification technology feature, and a court may require a
101 global positioning system feature for such device.
102 (5) The court order or the director's grant of the
103 limited or restricted driving privilege shall indicate the
104 termination date of the privilege, which shall be not later
105 than the end of the period of suspension or revocation. The
106 court order or the director's grant of the limited or
107 restricted driving privilege shall also indicate whether a
108 functioning, certified ignition interlock device is required
109 as a condition of operating a motor vehicle with the limited
110 driving privilege. A copy of any court order shall be sent
111 by the clerk of the court to the director, and a copy shall
112 be given to the driver which shall be carried by the driver
113 whenever such driver operates a motor vehicle. The director
114 of revenue upon granting a limited driving privilege shall
115 give a copy of the limited driving privilege to the
116 applicant. The applicant shall carry a copy of the limited
117 driving privilege while operating a motor vehicle. A


118 conviction which results in the assessment of points
119 pursuant to section 302.302, other than a violation of a
120 municipal stop sign ordinance where no accident is involved,
121 against a driver who is operating a vehicle pursuant to a
122 limited driving privilege terminates the privilege, as of
123 the date the points are assessed to the person's driving
124 record. If the date of arrest is prior to the issuance of
125 the limited driving privilege, the privilege shall not be
126 terminated. Failure of the driver to maintain proof of
127 financial responsibility, as required by chapter 303, or to
128 maintain proof of installation of a functioning, certified
129 ignition interlock device, as applicable, shall terminate
130 the privilege. The director shall notify by ordinary mail
131 the driver whose privilege is so terminated.
132 (6) Except as provided in subdivision (8) of this
133 subsection, no person is eligible to receive a limited
134 driving privilege whose license at the time of application
135 has been suspended or revoked for the following reasons:
136 (a) A conviction of any felony in the commission of
137 which a motor vehicle was used and such conviction occurred
138 within the five-year period prior to the date of
139 application. However, any felony conviction for leaving the
140 scene of an accident under section 577.060 shall not render
141 the applicant ineligible for a limited driving privilege
142 under this section;
143 (b) Ineligibility for a license because of the
144 provisions of subdivision (1), (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8),
145 (9), or (10) of subsection 1 of section 302.060; or
146 (c) Due to a suspension pursuant to subdivision (8) or
147 (10) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 or subsection 2 of
148 section 302.525.
149 (7) No person who possesses a commercial driver's
150 license shall receive a limited driving privilege issued for


151 the purpose of operating a commercial motor vehicle if such
152 person's driving privilege is suspended, revoked, cancelled,
153 denied, or disqualified. Nothing in this section shall
154 prohibit the issuance of a limited driving privilege for the
155 purpose of operating a noncommercial motor vehicle provided
156 that pursuant to the provisions of this section, the
157 applicant is not otherwise ineligible for a limited driving
158 privilege.
159 (8) (a) Provided that pursuant to the provisions of
160 this section, the applicant is not otherwise ineligible for
161 a limited driving privilege, a circuit court or the director
162 may, in the manner prescribed in this subsection, allow a
163 person who has had such person's license to operate a motor
164 vehicle revoked where that person cannot obtain a new
165 license for a period of ten years, as prescribed in
166 subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of section 302.060, to apply
167 for a limited driving privilege pursuant to this
168 subsection. Such person shall present evidence satisfactory
169 to the court or the director that such person's habits and
170 conduct show that the person no longer poses a threat to the
171 public safety of this state. A circuit court shall grant a
172 limited driving privilege to any individual who otherwise is
173 eligible to receive a limited driving privilege, has filed
174 proof of installation of a certified ignition interlock
175 device, and has had no alcohol-related enforcement contacts
176 since the alcohol-related enforcement contact that resulted
177 in the person's license denial.
178 (b) Provided that pursuant to the provisions of this
179 section, the applicant is not otherwise ineligible for a
180 limited driving privilege or convicted of acting with
181 criminal negligence while driving while intoxicated to cause
182 the death of another person, a circuit court or the director
183 may, in the manner prescribed in this subsection, allow a


184 person who has had such person's license to operate a motor
185 vehicle revoked where that person cannot obtain a new
186 license for a period of five years because of two
187 convictions of driving while intoxicated, as prescribed in
188 subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of section 302.060, to
189 apply for a limited driving privilege pursuant to this
190 subsection. Such person shall present evidence satisfactory
191 to the court or the director that such person's habits and
192 conduct show that the person no longer poses a threat to the
193 public safety of this state. Any person who is denied a
194 license permanently in this state because of an alcohol-
195 related conviction subsequent to a restoration of such
196 person's driving privileges pursuant to subdivision (9) of
197 subsection 1 of section 302.060 shall not be eligible for
198 limited driving privilege pursuant to the provisions of this
199 subdivision. A circuit court shall grant a limited driving
200 privilege to any individual who otherwise is eligible to
201 receive a limited driving privilege, has filed proof of
202 installation of a certified ignition interlock device, and
203 has had no alcohol-related enforcement contacts since the
204 alcohol-related enforcement contact that resulted in the
205 person's license denial.
206 (9) A DWI docket or court established under section
207 478.007 may grant a limited driving privilege to a
208 participant in or graduate of the program who would
209 otherwise be ineligible for such privilege under another
210 provision of law.
211 4. Any person who has received notice of denial of a
212 request of limited driving privilege by the director of
213 revenue may make a request for a review of the director's
214 determination in the circuit court of the county in which
215 the person resides or the county in which is located the
216 person's principal place of business or employment within


217 thirty days of the date of mailing of the notice of denial.
218 Such review shall be based upon the records of the
219 department of revenue and other competent evidence and shall
220 be limited to a review of whether the applicant was
221 statutorily entitled to the limited driving privilege.
222 5. The director of revenue shall promulgate rules and
223 regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this
224 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
225 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
226 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
227 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
228 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
229 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
230 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
231 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
232 date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
233 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
234 any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2001, shall be
235 invalid and void.
302.341. 1. If a Missouri resident charged with a
moving traffic violation of this state or any county or
municipality of this state fails to dispose of the charges
of which the resident is accused through authorized
prepayment of fine and court costs and fails to appear on
the return date or at any subsequent date to which the case
has been continued, or without good cause fails to pay any
fine or court costs assessed against the resident for any
such violation within the period of time specified or in
such installments as approved by the court or as otherwise
provided by law, any court having jurisdiction over the
charges shall within ten days of the failure to comply
inform the defendant by ordinary mail at the last address
shown on the court records that the court [will] may order


the director of revenue to suspend the defendant's driving
privileges if the charges are not disposed of and fully paid
within thirty days from the date of mailing. Thereafter, if
the defendant fails to timely act to dispose of the charges
and fully pay any applicable fines and court costs, the
court [shall] may notify the director of revenue of such
failure and of the pending charges against the defendant.
Upon receipt of this notification, the director shall
suspend the license of the driver, effective immediately,
and provide notice of the suspension to the driver at the
last address for the driver shown on the records of the
department of revenue. Such suspension shall remain in
effect until the court with the subject pending charge
requests setting aside the noncompliance suspension pending
final disposition, or satisfactory evidence of disposition
of pending charges and payment of fine and court costs, if
applicable, is furnished to the director by the individual.
The filing of financial responsibility with the [bureau of
safety responsibility,] department of revenue[,] shall not
be required as a condition of reinstatement of a driver's
license suspended solely under the provisions of this
[section] subsection.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall not apply to minor traffic violations as defined in
section 479.350; however, minor traffic violations shall be
subject to subsection 3 of this section. Minor traffic
violations shall not include nonmoving violations such as,
but not limited to, parking, standing, or stopping
violations, including expired meter violations.
3. If a Missouri resident charged with a minor traffic
violation of this state or any county or municipality of
this state fails to dispose of the charges of which the
resident is accused through authorized prepayment of fine


and court costs and fails to appear on two return dates, or
without good cause fails to pay any fine or court costs
assessed against the resident for any such violation within
the period of time specified or in such installments as
approved by the court or as otherwise provided by law, any
court having jurisdiction over the charges shall, within ten
days of the failure to comply, inform the defendant by
ordinary mail at the last address shown on the court records
that the court may order the director of revenue to suspend
the defendant's driving privileges if the charges are not
disposed of and fully paid within thirty days from the date
of mailing. Thereafter, if the defendant fails to timely
act to dispose of the charges and fully pay any applicable
fines and court costs, the court may notify the director of
revenue of such failure and of the pending charges against
the defendant. Upon receipt of this notification, the
director shall suspend the license of the driver and provide
notice of the suspension at the last address for the driver
shown on the records of the department of revenue. The
director shall, thirty-three days after mailing the
suspension notice, suspend the driving privileges of the
defendant. Such suspension shall remain in effect until the
court with the subject pending charge requests setting aside
the noncompliance suspension pending final disposition, or
satisfactory evidence of disposition of pending charges and
payment of fine and court costs, if applicable, is furnished
to the director by the individual. The filing of financial
responsibility with the department of revenue shall not be
required as a condition of reinstatement of a driver's
license suspended solely under the provisions of this
subsection.
4. Subsection 3 of this section shall not be
retroactive.


Section B. The repeal and reenactment of sections
302.309 and 302.341 of this act shall become effective on
January 1, 2027.